dev/verbs.fa.dix
    <pardef n="/budan__vbser">
      <e>       <p><l>budan</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>budan</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C_verb"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>bud</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>buda</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>buda</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>budagī</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="ppgi"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>budagist</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="pic"/></r></p><par n="kard.an__vblex"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>hastam</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hasti</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>hast</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ast</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hastem</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hasted</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hastand</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>nestam</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nesti</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nest</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ne</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nestem</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nested</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nestand</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>mebošam</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>meboši</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mebošad</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mebošim</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mebošid</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mebošand</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>bošam</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>boši</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>bošad</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>bošim</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>bošid</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>bošand</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>nabošam</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>naboši</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nabošad</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nabošim</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nabošid</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nabošand</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>budam</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>budī</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>bud</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>budem</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>buded</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>budand</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>nabudam</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nabudī</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nabud</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nabudem</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nabuded</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nabudand</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>buda</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="S__budan"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>nabuda</l><r>budan<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="S__budan"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gu/janda__vblex"> <!-- Present participle and verbal adverb -->
      <e>       <p><l>janda</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>janda</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V_verb"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>on</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>on</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V_verb"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/un.anda__vblex"> <!-- Present participle and verbal adverb -->
      <e>       <p><l>anda</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anda</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V_verb"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>on</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>on</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V_verb"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gu/ft.an__vblex"> <!-- Personal suffixes for present tense (vowel ending stem I) -->
      <e>       <p><l>jam</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__va_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ī</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__va_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jad</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__va_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>em</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__va_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ed</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__va_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jand</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__va_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/ard.an__vblex"> <!-- Personal suffixes for present tense (consonant ending stem I) -->
      <e>       <p><l>م</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__va_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__va_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>د</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__va_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__va_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__va_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ند</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__va_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="donistan"><p><l>دان</l><r>دانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="k/ard.an__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="donistan"><p><l>دان</l><r>دانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="k/ard.an__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="donistan"><p><l>میدان</l><r>دانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="k/ard.an__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="donistan"><p><l>نمی‍دان</l><r>دانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="k/ard.an__vblex"/></e>
